Utah statutes.
41-22-12.8.   Exceptions to off-highway vehicle use restrictions.
The cross-country motor vehicle and off-highway vehicle restrictions in
Sections 41-22-12.1, 41-22-12.2, 41-22-12.5, and 41-22-12.7 do not apply to:
(1)  a law enforcement officer or emergency services personnel acting within
the course and scope of their employment;
(2)  an employee of the landowner or land manager acting within the course and
scope of their employment;
(3)  a person otherwise authorized to use a motor vehicle in a closed area by
legal right or by permission of the landowner or land manager; and
(4)  a person operating a motor vehicle on an R.S. 2477 right-of-way recorded
or asserted by the state or a local highway authority.
